src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-nouns.lexc
LEXICON Z2+rZ !!= * @CODE@ 
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCiar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+ILATSI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCilatsi IV_voq ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCerniar IV_r ; !+IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KILLI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkilli XIi_voqXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>%TRUNClerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCleri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNClersuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNClisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv@U.Liur.On@:%>%TRUNClior@U.Liur.On@ IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCliuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCninip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+SAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCnngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCqar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r ;
+U+Der/nv:%>u IV_voq ;
+USAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCusaar IV_r_stem ;
+N+Abs+Sg: Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl:%>%CVqTRUNCrnit K_plur ; 
+N+Abs+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngit K_plur ; 
+N+Abs+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrit K_plur ; 
+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ga Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrna Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnga Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCni Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+TTAAQ:%>%TRUNCnissaaq # ;
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkka K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCtit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrni K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngi K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCni K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>put Krestr ; !Z2+rZ !regel %> %TRUNC r p u t -> %> p u t || k %> _
+N+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>si Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnat Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngat Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>tik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCvut K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCgut K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCsi K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrni K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngi K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCrnup Krestr ; 
+N+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngup Krestr ; 
+N+Rel+Sg+Orth/Youth:%>%TRUNCup Krestr ; !PL20240411 fundet hos Sørine
+N+Rel+Pl:%>%CVqTRUNCrnit K_plur ; 
+N+Rel+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrit K_plur ; 
+N+Rel+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngit K_plur ; 
+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ma Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>pit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnata Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngata Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>mi Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCma K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>ma K_plur ;
+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCvit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnisa K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngisa K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmi K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtta Krestr ; !Z2+rZ 
+N+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssi Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnata Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngata Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>mik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtta K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssi K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnisa K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngisa K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss:%>mik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg:%>mut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl:%>nut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnanut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrninut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ 
+N+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnannut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngannut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>minnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrninut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>mit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>nit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnanit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrninit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>minit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnannit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngannit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>minnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrninit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ !regel %> %TRUNC a n n i t -> %> %TRUNC i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | --- 
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginit AblVb ;
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnit AblVb ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>miit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>niit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>niik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnaniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnaniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganiit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganiik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>miniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>miniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrniniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrniniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginiit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginiik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>miniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>miniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>minniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>minniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrniniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ !regel %> %TRUNC a n n i t -> %> %TRUNC i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | ---
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrniniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ !regel %> %TRUNC a n n i t -> %> %TRUNC i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | --- 
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginiit K_plur ;
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnginiik K_plur ;
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>minngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>ninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>ninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnaninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnaninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganinngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganinngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>mininngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>mininngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnininngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrngininngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>mininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>mininngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnanninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnanninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCrnganninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>minninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>minninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z2+rZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCrnininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z2+rZ !regel %> %TRUNC a n n i t -> %> %TRUNC i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | ---
